Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-123
Community service projects; inmate participation; good time; effect.

Inmate participation in community service projects shall be voluntary and no extra good-time credit shall be given to inmates who participate in a community service project. In no event shall an inmate's decision to participate or not participate in a community service project have any bearing on the granting of good-time credit.

Laws 1983, LB 180, § 2.